California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(A) At a congregate living health facility licensed by the State Department of Public Health that is designated as six beds or fewer.

(B) At an intermediate care facility licensed by the State Department of Public Health that is designated as six beds or fewer.

(C) At an adult day health care center licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(D) As an employee of a home health
 agency licensed by the State Department of Public Health or an individual nurse provider working in a residential home.

(E) At a pediatric day health and respite care facility licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(F) At a small family home licensed by the State Department of Social Services that is designated as six beds or fewer.

(G) As a private duty nurse as part of daily transportation and activities outside a patient’s residence or family respite for home- and community-based patients.

(3) This subdivision is operative on January 1, 2028.

(k) The performance of pulmonary function testing by persons who are currently employed by Los Angeles County hospitals and have
 performed pulmonary function testing for at least 15 years.

(l) The performance of suctioning and other basic respiratory tasks and services by a vocational nurse licensed by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California under the supervision of a credentialed school nurse in accordance with Sections 49423.5 and 49426.5 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (SB 389)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3766.

(a) The board may issue a citation containing an order of abatement and civil penalties against a person who acts in the capacity of, or engages in the business of, a respiratory care practitioner in this state without having a license in good standing issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The board may issue a citation containing an order of abatement and civil penalties against a person employing or contracting with a person who acts in the capacity of, or engages in the business of, a respiratory care practitioner in this state without having a license in good standing issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3767.

(a) The board shall issue a citation to a person and to his or her employer or contractor, if, upon inspection or investigation, either upon complaint or otherwise, the following conditions are met:

(1) The board has probable cause to believe that the person is acting in the capacity of, or engaging in the practice of, a respiratory care practitioner in this state without having a license in good standing issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The person is not otherwise exempted from the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Each citation issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be in writing and describe with particularity the basis of the citation.

(2) Contain an order of abatement and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(c) A person served with a citation may appeal to the board within 15 calendar days after service of the citation with respect to any of the following:

(1) The violations alleged.

(2) The scope of the order of abatement.

(3) The amount of the civil penalty assessed.

(d) If, within 15 calendar days after service of the citation, the person cited fails to notify the board that he or she intends to appeal the citation, the citation shall be deemed a final order of the board and not subject to review by any court or agency. The board may extend the 15-day period for good cause.

(e) (1) If a person cited under this section notifies the board in a timely manner that he or she intends to contest the citation, the board shall afford an opportunity for a hearing.

(2) The board shall thereafter issue a decision, based on findings of fact, affirming, modifying, or vacating the citation, or directing other appropriate relief.

(f) With the approval of the board, the executive officer shall prescribe procedures for the issuance and appeal of a citation and procedures for a hearing under this section. The board shall adopt regulations covering the assessment of a civil penalty that shall give due consideration to the gravity of the violation, and any history of previous violations.

(g) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from and in addition to, any other civil or criminal remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3768.

(a) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in Section 3767, and as adopted by regulation, the board may apply to the appropriate superior court for both of the following:

(1) A judgment in the amount of the civil penalty.

(2) An order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of abatement.

(b) The application described in subdivision (a) shall include a certified copy of the final order of the board.

(c) The application described in subdivision (a) shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(d) The board may employ collection agencies or other methods in order to collect civil penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3769.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision, the board may, by stipulation with the affected licensee, issue a public reprimand, after it has conducted an investigation, in lieu of filing or prosecuting a formal accusation.

(b) The stipulation shall contain the authority, grounds, and causes and circumstances for taking such action and by way of waiving the affected licensee’s rights, inform the licensee of his or her rights to have a formal accusation filed and stipulate to a settlement thereafter or have the matter in the statement of issues heard before an administrative law judge in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part
 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) The stipulation shall be public information and shall be used as evidence in any future disciplinary or penalty action taken by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 5.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fiscal Administration [3770. - 3779.]

3770.

The department shall keep a record of its proceedings under this chapter, and a register of all persons licensed under it. The register shall show the name of every living licensed respiratory care practitioner, his or her last known place of residence, or address of record, and the date and number of his or her certificate as a respiratory care practitioner. The department shall, once every two years, compile a list of respiratory care practitioners authorized to practice respiratory care in the state. Any interested person is entitled to obtain a copy of that list upon application to the department and payment of an amount as may be fixed by the department, which amount shall not exceed the cost of the list so furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3771.

Within 10 days after the beginning of each calendar month, the board shall report to the Controller the amount and source of all collections made from persons licensed or seeking to be licensed under this chapter, and all fines and forfeitures to which the board is entitled, and at the same time, pay all these sums into the State Treasury, where they shall be credited to the Respiratory Care Fund, which is hereby created to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 12.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3772.

There is established in the State Treasury the Respiratory Care Fund. All collections from persons licensed or seeking to be licensed under this chapter shall be paid by the board into the fund after the report to the Controller at the beginning of each month of the amount and source of the collections. Moneys in the fund shall be available to the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 600, Sec. 16.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3773.

(a) At the time of application for renewal of a respiratory care practitioner license, the licensee shall notify the board of all of the following:

(1) Whether he or she has been convicted of any crime subsequent to the licensee’s previous renewal.

(2) The name and address of the licensee’s current employer or employers.

(b) The licensee shall cooperate in furnishing additional information as requested by the board. If the licensee fails to provide the requested information within 30 days, the license shall be made inactive until the information is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 35.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3774.

On or before the birthday of a licensed practitioner in every other year, following the initial licensure, the board shall mail to each practitioner licensed under this chapter, at the latest address furnished by the licensed practitioner to the executive officer of the board, a notice stating the amount of the renewal fee and the date on which it is due. The notice shall state that failure to pay the renewal fee on or before the due date and submit evidence of compliance with Sections 3719 and 3773 shall result in expiration of the license.

Each license not renewed in accordance with this section shall expire but may within a period of three years thereafter be reinstated upon payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees and penalty fees required by this chapter. The board may also require submission of proof of the applicant’s qualifications, except that during the three-year period no examination shall be required as a condition for the reinstatement of any expired license that has lapsed solely by reason of nonpayment of the renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3775.

The amount of fees provided in connection with licenses or approvals for the practice of respiratory care shall be as follows:

(a) The application fee shall be established by the board at not more than three hundred dollars ($300). The application fee for the applicant under subdivision (c) of Section 3740 shall be established by the board at not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(b) The fees for any examination or reexamination required by the board shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering each examination or reexamination.

(c) The initial license fee for a respiratory care practitioner shall be no more than three hundred dollars ($300).

(d) For any license term beginning on or after January 1, 1999, the renewal fee shall be established at two hundred thirty dollars ($230). The board may increase the renewal fee, by regulation, to an amount not to exceed three hundred thirty dollars ($330). The board shall fix the renewal fee so that, together with the estimated amount from revenue, the reserve balance in the board’s contingent fund shall be equal to approximately six months of annual authorized expenditures. If the estimated reserve balance in the board’s contingent fund will be greater than six months, the board shall reduce the renewal fee. In no case shall the fee in any year be more than 10 percent greater than the amount of the fee in the preceding year.

(e) The delinquency fee shall be established by the board at not more than the following amounts:

(1) If the license is renewed not more than two years from the date of its expiration, the delinquency fee shall be 100 percent of the renewal fee in effect at the time or renewal.

(2) If the license is renewed after two years, but not more than three years, from the date of expiration of the license, the delinquency fee shall be 200 percent of the renewal fee in effect at the time of renewal.

(f) The duplicate license fee shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(g) The endorsement fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(h) Costs incurred by the board in order to obtain and review documents or information related to the criminal history of, rehabilitation of, disciplinary actions taken by another state agency against, or acts of negligence in the practice of respiratory care by, an applicant or licensee, shall be paid by the applicant or licensee before a license will be issued or a subsequent renewal processed.

(i) Fees paid in any form other than check, money order, or cashier’s check shall be subject to an additional processing charge equal to the board’s actual processing costs.

(j) Fees incurred by the board to process return mail shall be paid by the applicant or licensee for whom the charges were incurred.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board, in its discretion, may reduce the amount of any fee otherwise prescribed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3775.5.

The fee for an inactive license shall be the same as the renewal fee for the practice of respiratory care as specified in Section 3775.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 830, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3775.6.

(a) A licensee may request that his or her license be placed in a “retired” status at any time, provided the license has not been canceled, and any outstanding fines, cost recovery, and monthly probation monitoring costs are paid in full.

(b) An individual with retired status is not subject to any renewal or reporting requirements.

(c) Once an individual is placed on retired status, all privileges to practice respiratory care are rescinded. If an individual practices with a “retired” license, the individual will be subject to discipline as prescribed by this chapter for the unlicensed practice of respiratory care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3776.

(a) Any person who submits to the board a check for fees that is returned unpaid shall pay all subsequent required fees by cashier’s check or money order.

(b) Any person who submits to the board a check for fees that is returned unpaid shall be assessed an additional processing fee as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 991, Sec. 14.4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3777.

Where an applicant is issued a license to practice respiratory care, and it is later discovered that all required fees have not been paid, approved continuing education is not reported or completed, employer information is not reported, or any other requirements as prescribed by this chapter are not met, the license shall not be renewed or reinstated unless all past and current required fees have been paid and all requirements are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3778.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may contract with a collection service for the purpose of collecting outstanding fees, fines, or cost recovery amounts, and may release personal information, including the birth date, telephone number, and social security number of any applicant or licensee for this purpose. The contractual agreement shall provide that the collection service shall not inappropriately use or release personal information, and shall provide safeguards to ensure that the information is protected from inappropriate disclosure. The contractual agreement shall hold the collection service liable for inappropriate use or disclosure of personal information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3779.

For purposes of license verification, a person may rely upon the licensing information as it is displayed on the board’s Internet Web site that includes the issuance and expiration dates of any license issued by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Pharmacy [4000. - 4427.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [4000. - 4014.]

4000.

This chapter constitutes, and may be cited as, the Pharmacy Law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the California State Board of Pharmacy in which the administration and enforcement of this chapter is vested. The board consists of 13 members.

(b) The Governor shall appoint seven pharmacists who are licensees in good standing and who reside in different parts of the state to serve as members of the board. The Governor shall appoint four public members, and the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member who shall not be a licensee of the board, any other board under this division, or any board referred to in Section 1000 or 3600. Each appointing authority has power to remove from office at
 any time any member of the board appointed by that authority pursuant to
 Section 106.

(c) At least five of the seven pharmacist appointees to the board shall be pharmacists who are actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy. Additionally, the membership of the board shall include at least one pharmacist representative from each of the following practice settings: an acute care hospital, an independent community pharmacy, a chain community pharmacy, a compounding pharmacy specializing in human drug preparations, and a long-term health care or skilled nursing facility. The pharmacist appointees shall also include a pharmacist who is a member of a labor union that represents pharmacists. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “chain community pharmacy” means a chain of 75 or more stores in California under the same ownership, and an “independent community pharmacy” means a pharmacy owned by a
 person or entity who owns no more than four pharmacies in California.

(d) Members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms. Each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(e) Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any
 other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the California State Board of Pharmacy in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.5.

(a) The board shall establish and appoint a Pharmacy Technician Advisory Committee to advise and make recommendations to the board on matters relating to pharmacy technicians.

(b) The committee shall serve only in an advisory capacity to the board and the objectives, duties, and actions of the committee shall not be a substitute for, nor conflict with, any of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the board.

(c) The committee shall consist of the following:

(1) Four licensed pharmacy technicians representing a range of practice settings
 to provide a diversity of perspectives.

(2) Two licensed pharmacists, of whom one shall be a member of the board and shall be appointed by the board president.

(3) One member of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

(a) The board shall elect a president, a vice president, and a treasurer. The officers of the board shall be elected by a majority of the membership of the board.

(b) The principal office of the board shall be located in Sacramento. The board shall hold a meeting at least once in every four months. Members of the board may meet by teleconference pursuant to Section 11123 of the Government Code. Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 2.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

(a) The board, with the approval of the director, may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in them by this chapter. The executive officer shall not be a member of the board.

(b) The executive officer shall receive the compensation as established by the board with the approval of the Director of Finance. The executive officer shall also be entitled to travel and other expenses necessary in the performance of their duties.

(c) The executive officer shall maintain and update in a timely fashion
 records containing the names, titles, qualifications, and places of business of all persons subject to this chapter.

(d) The executive officer shall give receipts for all money received by them and pay it to the department, taking its receipt therefor. Besides the duties required by this chapter, the executive officer shall perform other duties pertaining to the office as may be required of them by the board.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 3.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

No member of the board shall teach pharmacy in any of its branches, unless he or she teaches as either one of the following:

(a) A teacher in a public capacity and in a college of pharmacy.

(b) A teacher of an approved continuing education class as, or under the control of, an accredited provider of continuing education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) The board may adopt rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this state, as may be necessary for the protection of the public. Included therein shall be the right to adopt rules and regulations as follows: for the proper and more effective enforcement and administration of this chapter; pertaining to the practice of pharmacy; relating to the sanitation of persons and establishments licensed under this chapter; pertaining to establishments wherein any drug or device is compounded, prepared, furnished, or dispensed; providing for standards of minimum equipment for establishments licensed under this chapter; pertaining to the sale of drugs by or through any mechanical device; and relating to pharmacy practice experience necessary for licensure as a pharmacist.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the board may adopt regulations permitting the dispensing of drugs or devices in emergency situations, and permitting dispensing of drugs or devices pursuant to a prescription of a person licensed to prescribe in a state other than California where the person, if licensed in California in the same licensure classification would, under California law, be permitted to prescribe drugs or devices and where the pharmacist has first interviewed the patient to determine the authenticity of the prescription.

(c) The adoption, amendment, or repeal by the board of these or any other board rules or regulations shall be in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

The board may adopt regulations consistent with this chapter and Section 111485 of the Health and Safety Code or regulations adopted thereunder, limiting or restricting the furnishing of a particular drug upon a finding that the otherwise unrestricted retail sale of the drug pursuant to Section 4057 is dangerous to the public health or safety.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

(a) Nothing in Section 4005 shall be construed as authorizing the board to adopt rules of professional conduct relating to price fixing or advertising of commodities.

(b) Nothing in Section 4005 shall be construed as authorizing the board to adopt any rule or regulation that would require that a pharmacist personally perform any function for which the education, experience, training, and specialized knowledge of a pharmacist are not reasonably required. However, rules and regulations may require that the function be performed only under the effective supervision of a pharmacist who shall have the overall responsibility for supervising all activities that take place in the pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

(a) Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board may employ legal counsel and inspectors of pharmacy. The inspectors, whether the inspectors are employed by the board or the department’s Division of Investigation, may inspect during business hours all pharmacies, wholesalers, dispensaries, stores, or places where drugs or devices are compounded, prepared, furnished, dispensed, or stored.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a pharmacy inspector may inspect or examine a physician’s office or clinic that does not have a permit under Section 4180 or 4190 only to the extent necessary to determine compliance with and to enforce either Section 4080 or 4081.

(c) (1) (A) A pharmacy inspector employed by the board or in the department’s Division of Investigation shall have the authority, as a public officer, to arrest, without warrant, any person whenever the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has, in the officer’s presence, violated a provision of this chapter or of Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) If the violation is a felony, or if the arresting officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has violated any provision that is declared to be a felony, although no felony has in fact been committed, the arresting officer may make an arrest although the violation or suspected violation did not occur in their presence.

(2) In any case in which an arrest authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a
 misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting inspector may, instead of taking the person before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. That chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(d) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, a person, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) within the scope of that person’s authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of an arrest that is lawful, or that the arresting officer, at the time of the arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful. An inspector shall not be deemed an aggressor or lose their right to self-defense by the use of reasonable force to effect the arrest, to prevent escape, or to overcome
 resistance.

(e) Any inspector may serve all processes and notices throughout the state.

(f) A pharmacy inspector employed by the board may enter a facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code to inspect an automated drug delivery system operated pursuant to Section 4119.

(g) A pharmacy inspector employed by the board may enter the location, or proposed location, of an automated drug delivery system to inspect that automated drug delivery system or proposed location pursuant to Article 25 (commencing with Section 4427).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

The board may not adopt or amend any rule or regulation that thereby would conflict with Section 1186 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

All authorized officers of the law, while investigating violations of this chapter in performance of their official duties, and any person working under their immediate direction, supervision, or instruction are immune from prosecution under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

The board shall administer and enforce this chapter and the Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

The board shall upon request furnish any person with a copy of the laws or regulations relating to dangerous drugs, the furnishing or possession of which is restricted by this article or by further rules of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4013.

(a) Any facility licensed by the board shall join the board’s email notification list within 60 days of obtaining a license or at the time of license renewal.

(b) Any facility licensed by the board shall update its email address with the board’s email notification list within 30 days of a change in the facility’s email address.

(c) An owner of two or more facilities licensed by the board may comply with subdivisions (a) and (b) by subscribing a single email address to the board’s email notification list, where the owner maintains an electronic notice system within all of its licensed facilities that, upon receipt of an email notification from the board, immediately transmits electronic notice of the
 same notification to all of its licensed facilities. If an owner chooses to comply with this section by using such an electronic notice system, the owner shall register the electronic notice system with the board within 60 days of initial licensure informing the board of the single email address to be utilized by the owner, describing the electronic notice system, and listing all facilities to which immediate notice will be provided. The owner shall update its email address with the board’s email notification list within 30 days of any change in the owner’s email address.

(d) (1) Each pharmacist, intern pharmacist, pharmacy technician, designated representative, and designated representative-3PL licensed in this state shall join the board’s email notification list within 60 days of obtaining a license or at the time of license renewal.

(2) Each pharmacist,
 intern pharmacist, pharmacy technician, designated representative, and designated representative-3PL licensed in this state shall update their email address with the board’s email notification list within 30 days of a change in the licensee’s email address.

(3) The email address provided by a licensee shall not be posted on the board’s online license verification system.

(4) The board shall, with each renewal application, remind licensees of their obligation to report and keep current their email address with the board’s email notification list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 5.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

(a) The board shall have exclusive authority to interpret and enforce the provisions of this chapter regarding the practice of pharmacy and the licensing of pharmacists and pharmacies.

(b) Any violation of this chapter by a licensee of the board shall be determined exclusively by the board.

(c) The board shall have the sole authority to conduct investigations, hold hearings, and impose disciplinary actions for violations of this chapter by licensees of the board.

(d) Nothing in this
 section shall be construed to prohibit the board from evaluating or acting regarding unlicensed activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 4.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [4015. - 4046.]

4015.

For purposes of this chapter, the definitions of the terms in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter, unless otherwise indicated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.

“Administer” means the direct application of a drug or device to the body of a patient or research subject by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or other means.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.5.

“Advanced pharmacist practitioner” means a licensed pharmacist who has been recognized as an advanced pharmacist practitioner by the board, pursuant to Section 4210. A board-recognized advanced pharmacist practitioner is entitled to practice advanced practice pharmacy, as described in Section 4052.6, within or outside of a licensed pharmacy as authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 5.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.

“Authorized officers of the law” means inspectors of the California State Board of Pharmacy, inspectors of the Food and Drug Branch of the State Department of Public Health, and investigators of the department’s Division of Investigation or peace officers engaged in official investigations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 20.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.3.

(a) An “automated drug delivery system” (ADDS) means a mechanical system that performs operations or activities, other than compounding or administration, relative to the storage, dispensing, or distribution of drugs. An ADDS shall collect, control, and maintain all transaction information to accurately track the movement of drugs into and out of the system for security, accuracy, and accountability.

(b) An “automated unit dose system” (AUDS) is an ADDS for storage and retrieval of unit doses of drugs for administration to patients by persons authorized to perform these functions.

(c) An “automated patient dispensing system” (APDS) is an ADDS for storage and dispensing of prescribed drugs directly to
 patients pursuant to prior authorization by a pharmacist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 6.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.

“Board” means the California State Board of Pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.

An “order,” entered on the chart or medical record of a patient registered in a hospital or a patient under emergency treatment in the hospital, by or on the order of a practitioner authorized by law to prescribe drugs, shall be authorization for the administration of the drug from hospital floor or ward stocks furnished by the hospital pharmacy or under licensure granted under Section 4056, and shall be considered to be a prescription if the medication is to be furnished directly to the patient by the hospital pharmacy or another pharmacy furnishing prescribed drugs for hospital patients; provided that the chart or medical record of the patient contains all of the information required by Sections 4040 and 4070 and the order is signed by the practitioner authorized by law to prescribe drugs, if he or she is present when the drugs are given. If he or she is not present when the drugs are given, the order shall be signed either by the attending physician responsible for the patient’s care at the time the drugs are given to the patient or by the practitioner who ordered the drugs for the patient on the practitioner’s next visit to the hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 858, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.

“Controlled substance” means any substance listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.5.

(a) “Correctional pharmacy” means a pharmacy, licensed by the board, for the purpose of providing drugs and pharmaceutical care to inmates of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) As part of its pharmaceutical care, a correctional pharmacy may dispense or administer medication pursuant to a chart order, as defined in Section 4019, or other valid prescription consistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

“Dangerous drug” or “dangerous device” means any drug or device unsafe for self-use in humans or animals, and includes the following:

(a) Any drug that bears the legend: “Caution: federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription,” “Rx only,” or words of similar import.

(b) Any device that bears the statement: “Caution: federal law restricts this device to sale by or on the order of a ____,” “Rx only,” or words of similar import, the blank to be filled in with the designation of the practitioner licensed to use or order use of the device.

(c) Any other drug or device that by federal or state law can be lawfully dispensed only on prescription or furnished pursuant to Section 4006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.5.
